District of Columbia statutes.
16-548

Attachment of judgments and money or property in hands of marshal.

(a)

An attachment may be levied upon debts due to the defendant upon a judgment or decree by a service similar to that prescribed by section 16-546 upon the debtor owing the debts.

(b)

An attachment may be levied upon money or property of the defendant in the hands of the marshal. It binds the money or property from the time of service, and is a legal excuse to the officer for not paying or delivering the same as he would otherwise be bound to do.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-548.
1973 Ed., § 16-548.